District of Columbia statutes.
32-1512

Guardian for minor or incompetent.

The Mayor may require the appointment by a court of competent jurisdiction, for any person who is mentally incompetent or a minor, of a guardian or other representative to receive compensation payable to such person under this chapter and to exercise the powers granted to or to perform the duties required of such person under this chapter.

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 13, 27 DCR 2503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-312.